Massachusetts, session 194th, S760.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 123 of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof
the following paragraph:-
No life insurance company shall accept or take action on any written request to change
the designation of beneficiary under any policy of life or endowment insurance unless the
signature of the person requesting the change is witnessed by a disinterested person; provided,
however, that it shall not be a violation of this section for a life insurance company to accept or
take action on a request submitted without such witness if the person requesting the change
utilizes an online tool offered by the life insurance company to request a change of beneficiary;
provided further, that prior to accepting or taking action on a request submitted utilizing an
online tool as described herein, a life insurance company shall take reasonable steps to verify the
identity and intention of the person requesting the change; and provided further, that a life
of 2

insurance company may utilize remote technologies to verify such person’s identity including,
but not limited to, phone or videoconference. For purposes of this section, a disinterested person
is one who is over 18 years of age and not designated as a beneficiary in the requested change.
Upon receipt and acceptance of the change of designation of beneficiary, the insurance company
shall provide written notice of the change to the insured at the owner's last known address;
provided, however, that such notice may be delivered to the insured by electronic mail if the
change was requested through an online tool.
of 2